District of Columbia statutes.
38-161

Attendance at Teachers College by foreign students.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, not to exceed 25 foreign students who are in the United States on valid unexpired student visas may be permitted to attend the District of Columbia Teachers College each year on the same basis, so far as payment of tuition and fees are concerned, as a resident of the District of Columbia. Admission to and attendance at such college by such students shall be subject to rules and regulations prescribed by the Board of Education of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 98, Pub. L. 85-384, § 1

History

This section is referenced in § 38-304.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 38-301.
1981 Ed., § 31-601.
1973 Ed., § 31-301a.

Prior Codifications

The District of Columbia Teachers College, referred to in this section, has been absorbed into the University of the District of Columbia pursuant to Chapter 12 of this title.

References in Text